src/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON Adpositions

вылын:выл PO-SPAT_  "(kpv)..вылын:выл.." ;
дынӧ:дын PO-SPAT-ILL  "(kpv)..дінӧ:дін.." ;
одзын:одз PO-SPAT-INE  "KPV:водзын:водз" ;
